trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/be/hunspell/be_BY.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1807 Y 1
SFX 1807 0 нуся .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 нуўшую .
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 0 стку .
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 0 сткі .
SFX 836 Y 1
SFX 836 0 овую .
SFX 4449 Y 1
SFX 4449 0 ізаваўшых .
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 0 ізаваўшыя .
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 0 біўшых .
SFX 4266 Y 1
SFX 4266 0 біўшыя .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 жным .
SFX 2665 Y 1
SFX 2665 0 ону .
SFX 3425 Y 1
SFX 3425 0 оны .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 чваеце .
SFX 2642 Y 1
SFX 2642 0 яўшаю .
SFX 2641 Y 1
SFX 2641 0 яўшая .
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 0 ьваючую .
SFX 1170 Y 1
SFX 1170 0 ачным .
SFX 2498 Y 1
SFX 2498 0 снае .
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 0 снай .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 чыўшаю .
SFX 1800 Y 1
SFX 1800 0 чыўшая .
SFX 3168 Y 1
SFX 3168 0 жваўшых .
SFX 3167 Y 1
SFX 3167 0 жваўшыя .
SFX 3730 Y 1
SFX 3730 0 неўшую .
SFX 4620 Y 1
SFX 4620 0 гае .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 гай .
SFX 3556 Y 1
SFX 3556 0 гам .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 уючаю .
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 0 уючая .
SFX 4217 Y 1
SFX 4217 0 олаг .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 ьваючага .
SFX 2531 Y 1
SFX 2531 0 ціўшым .
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 0 плю .
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 0 ьвае .
SFX 2220 Y 1
SFX 2220 0 ьвай .
SFX 1941 Y 1
SFX 1941 0 жанаму .
SFX 1054 Y 1
SFX 1054 0 ячага .
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 0 жваючымі .
SFX 2773 Y 1
SFX 2773 0 хаўшаю .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 хаўшая .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 0 дзяць .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 чным .
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 0 ацыяю .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 іла .
SFX 4896 Y 1
SFX 4896 0 ікай .
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 0 ікам .
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 0 аванымі .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 змам .
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 0 рыць .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 аюць .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 шчыках .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 шчыкаў .
SFX 2608 Y 1
SFX 2608 0 зімся .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 оўкай .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 оўкам .
SFX 1722 Y 1
SFX 1722 0 ерам .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 тнымі .
SFX 3558 Y 1
SFX 3558 0 ажу .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 ажы .
SFX 3499 Y 1
SFX 3499 0 каваўшую .
SFX 4274 Y 1
SFX 4274 0 біўшаму .
SFX 3035 Y 1
SFX 3035 0 мах .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 0 маю .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 мая .
SFX 1933 Y 1
SFX 1933 0 маў .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 ніках .
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 нікаў .
SFX 3428 Y 1
SFX 3428 0 логіяю .
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 0 ваюцца .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 0 ызм .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 ніца .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 ніце .
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 0 лівымі .
SFX 4058 Y 1
SFX 4058 0 ьваюся .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 0 ачак .
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 0 ачам .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 іцеся .
SFX 3128 Y 1
SFX 3128 0 алогіяю .
SFX 2124 Y 1
SFX 2124 0 цыяю .
SFX 3984 Y 1
SFX 3984 0 алагічнымі .
SFX 4534 Y 1
SFX 4534 0 хацца .
SFX 4025 Y 1
SFX 4025 0 нтам .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 чваўшага .
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 0 ізавалі .
SFX 4688 Y 1
SFX 4688 0 сціся .
SFX 4755 Y 1
SFX 4755 0 зуючых .
SFX 4754 Y 1
SFX 4754 0 зуючыя .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 валася .
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 0 цтвам .
SFX 4003 Y 1
SFX 4003 0 чаўшых .
SFX 4002 Y 1
SFX 4002 0 чаўшыя .
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 0 леным .
SFX 3775 Y 1
SFX 3775 0 ыстых .
SFX 3774 Y 1
SFX 3774 0 ыстыя .
SFX 3529 Y 1
SFX 3529 0 шаную .
SFX 4594 Y 1
SFX 4594 0 заваных .
SFX 4593 Y 1
SFX 4593 0 заваныя .
SFX 1139 Y 1
SFX 1139 0 шу .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 шч .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 шы .
SFX 2796 Y 1
SFX 2796 0 рыўшую .
SFX 4998 Y 1
SFX 4998 0 ізаванымі .
SFX 4310 Y 1
SFX 4310 0 ураю .
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 0 жу .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 жы .
SFX 4232 Y 1
SFX 4232 0 ніцца .
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 0 нуўшых .
SFX 607 Y 1
SFX 607 0 нуўшыя .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 ізаваўшае .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 ізаваўшай .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 овых .
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 0 овыя .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 біўшае .
SFX 4275 Y 1
SFX 4275 0 біўшай .
SFX 3458 Y 1
SFX 3458 0 ануўшую .
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 0 валі .
SFX 3915 Y 1
SFX 3915 0 рыўся .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 сцямі .
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 0 цкую .
SFX 2954 Y 1
SFX 2954 0 жную .
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 0 акоў .
SFX 2301 Y 1
SFX 2301 0 ьваючых .
SFX 2300 Y 1
SFX 2300 0 ьваючыя .
SFX 3388 Y 1
SFX 3388 0 іравацца .
SFX 3961 Y 1
SFX 3961 0 заваць .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 ьваючае .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 ьваючай .
SFX 4279 Y 1
SFX 4279 0 білі .
SFX 3177 Y 1
SFX 3177 0 жваўшае .
SFX 3176 Y 1
SFX 3176 0 жваўшай .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 неўшых .
SFX 3726 Y 1
SFX 3726 0 неўшыя .
SFX 1171 Y 1
SFX 1171 0 ачную .
SFX 3896 Y 1
SFX 3896 0 уўшаму .
SFX 4066 Y 1
SFX 4066 0 шыўшы .
SFX 1943 Y 1
SFX 1943 0 жанага .
SFX 2523 Y 1
SFX 2523 0 аніце .
SFX 4037 Y 1
SFX 4037 0 зую .
SFX 1273 Y 1
SFX 1273 0 шчыцамі .
SFX 3097 Y 1
SFX 3097 0 паўшым .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 лку .
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 0 лкі .
SFX 4100 Y 1
SFX 4100 0 ранаму .
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 0 ўскі .
SFX 4806 Y 1
SFX 4806 0 антам .
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 0 пяць .
SFX 2533 Y 1
SFX 2533 0 ціўшую .
SFX 1121 Y 1
SFX 1121 0 ляцца .
SFX 1442 Y 1
SFX 1442 0 ўну .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 ўны .
SFX 3846 Y 1
SFX 3846 0 кавец .
SFX 3422 Y 1
SFX 3422 0 тарам .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 нуцца .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 цах .
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 0 цаю .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 цаў .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 чную .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 чыках .
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 0 чыкаў .
SFX 2670 Y 1
SFX 2670 0 каннем .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 біўшага .
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 0 чыку .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 чыкі .
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 0 ліваннем .
SFX 3495 Y 1
SFX 3495 0 каваўшых .
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 0 каваўшыя .
SFX 4965 Y 1
SFX 4965 0 ствах .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 ваўшаю .
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 0 ваўшая .
SFX 4966 Y 1
SFX 4966 0 стваў .
SFX 4079 Y 1
SFX 4079 0 чанін .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 ўцам .
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 0 ычнаю .
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 0 ычная .
SFX 2721 Y 1
SFX 2721 0 касць .
SFX 2809 Y 1
SFX 2809 0 касцю .
SFX 2810 Y 1
SFX 2810 0 касці .
SFX 4471 Y 1
SFX 4471 0 заваўся .
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 0 зьцеся .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 0 кімі .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 авалі .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 інамі .
SFX 2016 Y 1
SFX 2016 0 ыст .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 ыся .
SFX 1111 Y 1
SFX 1111 0 ное .
SFX 997 Y 1
SFX 997 0 ной .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 ном .
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 0 аваўшаю .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 аваўшая .
SFX 2562 Y 1
SFX 2562 0 чом .
SFX 4177 Y 1
SFX 4177 0 днымі .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 уем .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 0 ены .
SFX 4904 Y 1
SFX 4904 0 ень .
SFX 4738 Y 1
SFX 4738 0 коўцы .
SFX 4358 Y 1
SFX 4358 0 лінам .
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 0 зіліся .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 чанымі .
SFX 4763 Y 1
SFX 4763 0 зуючае .
SFX 4762 Y 1
SFX 4762 0 зуючай .
SFX 3257 Y 1
SFX 3257 0 альніках .
SFX 3258 Y 1
SFX 3258 0 альнікаў .
SFX 4631 Y 1
SFX 4631 0 анту .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 анты .
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 0 чаўшае .
SFX 4010 Y 1
SFX 4010 0 чаўшай .
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 ьскімі .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 0 рках .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 0 ркаю .
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 0 анах .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 анаю .
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 0 аная .
SFX 3468 Y 1
SFX 3468 0 анаў .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 авалася .
SFX 4365 Y 1
SFX 4365 0 іроўка .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 аўскіх .
SFX 1820 Y 1
SFX 1820 0 аўскія .
SFX 4188 Y 1
SFX 4188 0 ьна .
SFX 4541 Y 1
SFX 4541 0 оўнымі .
SFX 3210 Y 1
SFX 3210 0 хаем .
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 0 ыстае .
SFX 3782 Y 1
SFX 3782 0 ыстай .
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 0 ыстак .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 ыстам .
SFX 2696 Y 1
SFX 2696 0 чыцца .
SFX 4602 Y 1
SFX 4602 0 заванае .
SFX 4601 Y 1
SFX 4601 0 заванай .
SFX 3526 Y 1
SFX 3526 0 шаных .
SFX 3525 Y 1
SFX 3525 0 шаныя .
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 0 стым .
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 0 рыўшых .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 рыўшыя .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 0 альнік .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 ор .
SFX 3007 Y 1
SFX 3007 0 ох .
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 0 ою .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 оў .
SFX 1036 Y 1
SFX 1036 0 аўскі .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 нуўшае .
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 нуўшай .
SFX 831 Y 1
SFX 831 0 овае .
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 0 овай .
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 0 овак .
SFX 2392 Y 1
SFX 2392 0 туеш .
SFX 661 Y 1
SFX 661 0 кіх .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 кія .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 леную .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 стаму .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 0 стамі .
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 0 авік .
SFX 4999 Y 1
SFX 4999 0 ізаваным .
SFX 3454 Y 1
SFX 3454 0 ануўшых .
SFX 3453 Y 1
SFX 3453 0 ануўшыя .
SFX 4346 Y 1
SFX 4346 0 олагамі .
SFX 3463 Y 1
SFX 3463 0 ануўшае .
SFX 3462 Y 1
SFX 3462 0 ануўшай .
SFX 2951 Y 1
SFX 2951 0 жных .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 0 жныя .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 0 ніцкую .
SFX 3599 Y 1
SFX 3599 0 йным .
SFX 4060 Y 1
SFX 4060 0 ьваецеся .
SFX 4038 Y 1
SFX 4038 0 зуйце .
SFX 2624 Y 1
SFX 2624 0 ляешся .
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 0 эла .
SFX 1317 Y 1
SFX 1317 0 зіўшаму .
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 0 неўшае .
SFX 3734 Y 1
SFX 3734 0 неўшай .
SFX 3899 Y 1
SFX 3899 0 уўшага .
SFX 1168 Y 1
SFX 1168 0 ачных .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 ачныя .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 шыся .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 ковым .
SFX 4103 Y 1
SFX 4103 0 ранага .
SFX 2455 Y 1
SFX 2455 0 снаю .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 сная .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 кнуўшым .
SFX 4181 Y 1
SFX 4181 0 гах .
SFX 2631 Y 1
SFX 2631 0 гаю .
SFX 3016 Y 1
SFX 3016 0 гаў .
SFX 2916 Y 1
SFX 2916 0 арнымі .
SFX 3751 Y 1
SFX 3751 0 жваюцца .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 ьнасць .
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 0 ьнасцю .
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 0 ьнасці .
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 0 ціўшых .
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 0 ціўшыя .
SFX 4686 Y 1
SFX 4686 0 ўца .
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 0 ьваю .
SFX 2270 Y 1
SFX 2270 0 ьваў .
SFX 3098 Y 1
SFX 3098 0 паўшую .
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 0 ламу .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 ламі .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 атым .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 аўшаму .
SFX 1284 Y 1
SFX 1284 0 зіла .
SFX 4921 Y 1
SFX 4921 0 ача .
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 0 нічаючаму .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 аем .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 чных .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 чныя .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 ілі .
SFX 2253 Y 1
SFX 2253 0 іках .
SFX 4895 Y 1
SFX 4895 0 ікаю .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 ікаў .
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 0 каваўшае .
SFX 3503 Y 1
SFX 3503 0 каваўшай .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 0 шчыка .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 оўках .
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 0 оўкаю .
SFX 1863 Y 1
SFX 1863 0 ерах .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 ераў .
SFX 1562 Y 1
SFX 1562 0 ўскую .
SFX 4908 Y 1
SFX 4908 0 дзіліся .
SFX 4939 Y 1
SFX 4939 0 чэнне .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 еце .
SFX 3562 Y 1
SFX 3562 0 уна .
SFX 3278 Y 1
SFX 3278 0 уне .
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 0 ніцу .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 ніцы .
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 0 ніць .
SFX 4907 Y 1
SFX 4907 0 дзіўся .
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 0 падобным .
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 0 нтах .
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 0 нтаў .
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 0 чнымі .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 0 айся .
SFX 3662 Y 1
SFX 3662 0 каўся .
SFX 3386 Y 1
SFX 3386 0 каліся .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 авымі .
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 0 арскую .
SFX 1428 Y 1
SFX 1428 0 ча .
SFX 1875 Y 1
SFX 1875 0 ліваліся .
SFX 3534 Y 1
SFX 3534 0 шанае .
SFX 3533 Y 1
SFX 3533 0 шанай .
SFX 4251 Y 1
SFX 4251 0 ее .
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 0 ей .
SFX 3758 Y 1
SFX 3758 0 ек .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 ем .
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 0 рыўшае .
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 0 рыўшай .
SFX 4695 Y 1
SFX 4695 0 оўваючым .
SFX 2812 Y 1
SFX 2812 0 зацыяй .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 ліўшаму .
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 0 стага .
SFX 4244 Y 1
SFX 4244 0 кла .
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 0 леных .
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 0 леныя .
SFX 4837 Y 1
SFX 4837 0 цыйны .
SFX 4504 Y 1
SFX 4504 0 аламі .
SFX 3666 Y 1
SFX 3666 0 йскімі .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 ьнік .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 стую .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 0 ўнымі .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 арны .
SFX 4455 Y 1
SFX 4455 0 ізаваўшаю .
SFX 4454 Y 1
SFX 4454 0 ізаваўшая .
SFX 4273 Y 1
SFX 4273 0 біўшаю .
SFX 4272 Y 1
SFX 4272 0 біўшая .
SFX 3598 Y 1
SFX 3598 0 йнымі .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 цкае .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 цкай .
SFX 3061 Y 1
SFX 3061 0 жнае .
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 0 жнай .
SFX 2580 Y 1
SFX 2580 0 чвайце .
SFX 3059 Y 1
SFX 3059 0 жнаму .
SFX 4078 Y 1
SFX 4078 0 чванне .
SFX 3502 Y 1
SFX 3502 0 каваўшаму .
SFX 1320 Y 1
SFX 1320 0 зіўшага .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 вымі .
SFX 1425 Y 1
SFX 1425 0 нецца .
SFX 3600 Y 1
SFX 3600 0 йную .
SFX 1177 Y 1
SFX 1177 0 ачнае .
SFX 1174 Y 1
SFX 1174 0 ачнай .
SFX 4049 Y 1
SFX 4049 0 завала .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 0 лым .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 0 раваным .
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 0 зае .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 0 зай .
SFX 3250 Y 1
SFX 3250 0 зам .
